Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2930
Inpatient treatment program; aftercare treatment program; individual discharge plan.

If the Department of Health and Human Services determines that the convicted sex offender has received the maximum benefit of the inpatient treatment program operated by the Department of Health and Human Services and is ready for treatment in an aftercare treatment program, the person in charge of the inpatient treatment program shall develop an individual discharge plan documenting the findings and recommendations of the program and a designated aftercare treatment program. The individual discharge plan shall be provided to the Department of Correctional Services, the Board of Parole, and the designated aftercare treatment program.

Laws 1992, LB 523, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 84.